test/src/morphology/N-yidye_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - иˮ: # Noun 'water' - partial paradigm /Type 36 pal/
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom: иˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc: идмʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen: идʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat: итʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc: [икна, икана, икня, иканя]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl: икад
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros: [иˮимна, иˮимня]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom: икʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc: икʼ
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen: икʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom: идˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc: иде                   # иди?
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen: идеˮ                  # идиˮ?
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat: икˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc: [икаˮна, икˮна, икаˮня, икˮня]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl: икат
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros: идеˮмана
     
     иˮ+N+Tra: иˮӈэ
     иˮ+N+Car: ициˮ
     иˮ+N+Equ: итремʼ
     иˮ+N+Equ+Lat: итревʼ
     
# Possessive forms !Local case forms need to be checked!
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: иˮим
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: иˮил  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [итя, ита] 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: иˮмиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: иˮлиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: иˮмаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: иˮлаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: итоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: иˮим  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ит  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [итя, ита]  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: иˮмиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: иˮмаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: [итяˮ, итаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: итоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: иˮин   
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ит 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [итя, ита]  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: иˮниʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: иˮнаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: [итяˮ, итаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: итоʼ  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [икан, икани]  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: иканд  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: иканда 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: иканиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: икандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: икандиʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: иканаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: икандаˮ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: икандоʼ
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [иканан, иканян, иканани]    
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [икананд, икнанд, иканянд, икнянд]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [икананда, икнанда, иканянда, икнянда]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [икананиʼ, икнаниʼ, иканяниʼ, икняниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [иканандиʼ, икнандиʼ, иканяндиʼ, икняндиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [иканандиʼ, икнандиʼ, иканяндиʼ, икняндиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [икананаˮ , икнанаˮ, иканянаˮ, икнянаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [иканандаˮ, икнандаˮ, иканяндаˮ, икняндаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [иканандоʼ, икнандоʼ, иканяндоʼ, икняндоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [икадан, икдан, икадани]     
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [икаданд, икданд]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [икаданда, икданда]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [икаданиʼ, икданиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [икадандиʼ, икдандиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [икадандиʼ, икдандиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [икаданаˮ, икданаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [икадандаˮ, икдандаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [икадандоʼ, икдандоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [иˮимнан, иˮимнян, иˮимнани]  
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: [иˮимнанд, иˮимнянд]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: [иˮимнанда, иˮимнянда]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: [иˮимнаниʼ, иˮимняниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: [иˮимнандиʼ, иˮимняндиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: [иˮимнандиʼ, иˮимняндиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: [иˮимнанаˮ, иˮимнянаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: [иˮимнандаˮ, иˮимняндаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: [иˮимнандоʼ, иˮимняндоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [икаюн, икюн]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [икаюд, икюд]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [икаюда, икюда]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [икаюниʼ, икюниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [икаюдиʼ, икюдиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [икаюдиʼ, икюдиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [икаюнаˮ, икюнаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [икаюдаˮ, икюдаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [икаюдоʼ, икюдоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [икаюн, икюн]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [икаюд, икюд]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [икаюда, икюда]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [икаюниʼ, икюниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [икаюдиʼ, икюдиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [икаюдиʼ, икюдиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [икаюнаˮ, икюнаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [икаюдаˮ, икюдаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [икаюдоʼ, икюдоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [икаюн, икюн]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [икают, икют]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [икаюта, икюта]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [икаюниʼ, икюниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [икаютиʼ, икютиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [икаютиʼ, икютиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [икаюнаˮ, икюнаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [икаютаˮ, икютаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [икаютоʼ, икютоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [идени, иден]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: идед   
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: идеда  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: идениʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: идедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: идедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: иденаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: идедаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: идедоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: идени 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: идед   
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: идеда  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: идениʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: идедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: идедиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: иденаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: идедаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: идедоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: идеˮни  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: идет   
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: идета  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: идеˮниʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: идетиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: идетиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: идеˮнаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: идетаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: идетоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: икаˮн 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: икаˮн
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: икат 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: иката 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: икаˮниʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: икатиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: икатиʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: икаˮнаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: икатаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: икатоʼ 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [икаˮнан, икаˮнян]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [икаˮнат, икаˮнят]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [икаˮната , икаˮнята]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [икаˮнаниʼ, икаˮняниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [икаˮнатиʼ, икаˮнятиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [икаˮнатиʼ, икаˮнятиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [икаˮнанаˮ, икаˮнянаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [икаˮнатаˮ, икаˮнятаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [икаˮнатоʼ, икаˮнятоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [икатан, иктан]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [икатат, иктат]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [икатата, иктата]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [икатаниʼ, иктаниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [икататиʼ, иктатиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [икататиʼ, иктатиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [икатанаˮ, иктанаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [икататаˮ, иктатаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [икататоʼ, иктатоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: идеˮманан  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: идеˮманат  
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: идеˮманата 
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: идеˮмананиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: идеˮманатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: идеˮманатиʼ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: идеˮмананаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: идеˮманатаˮ
     иˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: идеˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative

     иˮ+N+Pred+Abs: ит
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [итав, итув] 
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: итар  
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [итада, итда]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [итав, итув]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: итамд
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [итамда, итмда]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: итан
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: итанд
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [итанда, итнда]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [итамиʼ, итмиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: итриʼ
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [итадиʼ, итдиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [итамиʼ, итмиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [итамдиʼ, итмдиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [итамдиʼ, итмдиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [итаниʼ, итниʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [итандиʼ, итндиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [итандиʼ, итндиʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: итваˮ
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: итраˮ
     иˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [итадоʼ, итдоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: итваˮ
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [итамдаˮ, итмдаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [итамдоʼ, итмдоʼ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [итанаˮ, итнаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [итандаˮ, итндаˮ]
     иˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [итандоʼ, итндоʼ]

# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: итмʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ит  
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: иˮ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: иˮниʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: итиʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: икʼ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: иˮмаˮ
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: итаˮ 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: идˮ     # or ?  иˮ 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: итамзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: итась 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: иць   
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: иˮнинзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: итинзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: иканзь
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: иˮмаць 
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: итаць  
     иˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: идаць      # or ? итёнзь  
